Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202588-550
Grain dust inspections; Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; commission; duties.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment and the commission shall, during the course of their regular inspections required by law, inspect warehouses for conditions which are or may be conducive to grain dust explosions. Such conditions shall include, but not be limited to, the presence at the warehouse of excessive grain dust, faulty equipment, or any other condition which could reasonably lead to an explosion if not corrected. The department and commission shall report any such condition to the State Fire Marshal as soon as practicable after each inspection.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 26;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 73;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 178;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 467.